Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 59.7
COLORADO RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT
FINANCE ACT OF 2009

Section

11-59.7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Recovery and Reinvestment Finance Act of 2009".

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2190, § 1, effective June 2.

11-59.7-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The federal "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009", Pub.L. 111-5, was enacted by the United States congress in response to a national economic crisis in order to stimulate spending, increase employment, and reduce unemployment in the United States as rapidly as possible, including spending and employment by states and local governments and those who provide goods and services to states and local governments;

The purpose of this article is to stimulate spending, increase employment, and reduce unemployment in Colorado as rapidly as possible by authorizing Colorado public entities to take full advantage of financing opportunities available under the federal recovery and reinvestment act; and

This article shall be interpreted in a manner that stimulates the maximum amount of spending, increases the maximum amount of employment, and reduces the maximum amount of unemployment in Colorado as rapidly as possible through the actions of Colorado public entities in taking full advantage of financing opportunities under the federal recovery and reinvestment act.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2190, § 1, effective June 2.

11-59.7-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 59.7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Ancillary agreement" means any contract, agreement, or other arrangement that a public entity determines is necessary or convenient in connection with a stimulus obligation, including but not limited to any agreement, contract, or other arrangement:

Pursuant to which the proceeds of such stimulus obligation are loaned or made available to or secured for another public entity, a nonprofit or for-profit corporation, a charter school, or any other person in accordance with the federal recovery and reinvestment act;

Relating to property that is leased or subleased pursuant to a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement or on which the proceeds of a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement are spent;

For credit or liquidity enhancement of, credit or liquidity support for, or interest rate protection with respect to the stimulus obligation;

That is an interest rate exchange agreement under article 59.3 of this title;

That relates to the investment of proceeds of the stimulus obligation;

For the purchase, sale, marketing, or remarketing of the stimulus obligation; or

For services in connection with the stimulus obligation.

"Ballot issue" has the same meaning as set forth in section 1-1-104 (2.3), C.R.S.

"Ballot question" has the same meaning as set forth in section 1-1-104 (2.7), C.R.S.

"Bond" means any bond, note, interim certificate, contract, evidence of indebtedness, loan, financing agreement, installment purchase or sale agreement, lease, financed purchase of an asset agreement, or certificate of participation agreement on which payments by a public entity are not subject to annual appropriation by its governing body or any debt or multiple-fiscal year financial obligation issued or entered into by a public entity.

"Build America bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54AA of the internal revenue code.

(5.5) "Certificate of participation" means any certificate evidencing a participation right or a proportionate interest in any financing agreement or the right to receive proportionate payments from the state or agency due under any financing agreement.

"Charter school" means a charter school as defined in section 22-30.5-103 (2), C.R.S., an independent charter school as defined in section 22-30.5-302 (6), C.R.S., or an institute charter school as defined in section 22-30.5-502 (6), C.R.S.

"Charter school bond issuer" means any public entity that is authorized under state law to finance or refinance a project for the benefit of a charter school through the issuance of bonds or the execution of a loan agreement, financing agreement, financed purchase of an asset, or certificate of participation agreement with a charter school.

"Clean renewable energy bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54 of the internal revenue code.

(8.5) "Colorado energy office" means the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101 (1), C.R.S.

"Commission on higher education" means the Colorado commission on higher education created and existing pursuant to article 1 of title 23, C.R.S.

"Federal direct payments" means amounts that the federal government is to pay to or on behalf of a public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation and elects to receive direct payments from the federal government with respect to the stimulus obligation pursuant to the internal revenue code.

"Federal recovery and reinvestment act" means the federal "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009", Pub.L. 111-5, and any amendments to the act or to any provision of the internal revenue code included in or amended by the act.

(11.5) "Financed purchase of an asset agreement" means a financing agreement that includes the purchase of an asset.

"Governing body" means a city council, board of trustees, commission, board of county commissioners, board of directors, governing board of a public institution of higher education, or other legislative body of a public entity in which the legislative powers of the public entity are vested. The governing body of the state treasurer, or of the state treasurer, acting on behalf of the state, is the state treasurer.

Repealed.

"Internal revenue code" has the same meaning as set forth in section 39-23.5-102 (9.5), C.R.S.

"Large local government" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54D of the internal revenue code.

"Large municipality" has the same meaning as set forth in section 1400U-1 of the internal revenue code.

Repealed.

"New clean renewable energy bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54C of the internal revenue code.

"Project" means any property, goods, or services on which the proceeds of a bond or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation financing are or may be spent, including but not limited to any job training or educational program on which the proceeds of recovery zone economic development bonds may be spent under federal law.

"Public entity" means the state, any agency, department, or political subdivision of the state, any quasi-governmental entity, or any other entity created by or pursuant to the constitution or laws of the state that is authorized under state law to issue bonds or enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, including but not limited to:

The state treasurer or the state treasurer, acting on behalf of the state;

A state agency or department;

A state authority;

A public institution of higher education, state educational institution, or other state institution, including its governing body or any other issuing authority of the institution constituting a body corporate;

A county or city and county;

A municipality;

A school district;

A special district organized or acting pursuant to the provisions of title 32, C.R.S.;

A district or authority organized or acting pursuant to the provisions of title 29, 30, or 31, C.R.S.;

A water conservancy district created pursuant to article 45 of title 37, C.R.S.;

Any other political subdivision or governmental or quasi-governmental entity of the state;

Any other public entity as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S.;

A recovery and reinvestment act finance authority;

An enterprise of any public entity listed in paragraphs (a) to (m) of this subsection (20); and

A nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of the state that is authorized by law, or a trust created under the laws of the state that is authorized under its governing documents, to issue bonds or enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements on behalf of one or more public entities listed in subsections (20)(a) to (20)(n) of this section.

"Public institution of higher education" means any state-supported institution of higher education that is obligated to conform to the policies set by the commission on higher education pursuant to section 23-1-102 (2), C.R.S.

"Public school capital construction assistance board" means the board created in section 22-43.7-106 (1)(a), C.R.S.

"Qualified energy conservation bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54D of the internal revenue code.

"Qualified energy conservation bond volume cap" means the dollar amount of qualified energy conservation bonds allocated to the state and the state's large local governments pursuant to section 54D of the internal revenue code.

"Qualified school construction bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54F of the internal revenue code.

"Qualified school construction bond volume cap" means the school district qualified school construction bond volume cap and the state qualified school construction bond volume cap and includes any portion of the school district qualified school construction bond volume cap that is reallocated to the public school capital construction assistance board pursuant to section 11-59.7-106.

"Qualified zone academy bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 54E of the internal revenue code.

"Qualified zone academy bond volume cap" means the volume cap for qualified zone academy bonds allocated by the federal government to the state pursuant to section 54E of the internal revenue code.

"Recovery and reinvestment act finance authority" means a separate legal entity created by contract between or among public entities for the purpose of issuing stimulus obligations pursuant to section 11-59.7-110.

"Recovery zone" means:

Any area designated by the public entity that issues or enters into a recovery zone bond as having significant poverty, unemployment, rate of home foreclosures, or general distress;

Any area designated by the public entity that issues or enters into a recovery zone bond as economically distressed by reason of the closure or realignment of a military installation pursuant to the federal "Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990", Pub.L. 101-510; and

Any area for which a designation as an empowerment zone or renewal community is in effect.

"Recovery zone bond" means both a recovery zone economic development bond and a recovery zone facility bond.

"Recovery zone economic development bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 1400U-2 of the internal revenue code.

"Recovery zone economic development bond project" means any property, goods, or services on which the proceeds of recovery zone economic development bonds may be spent under federal law.

"Recovery zone economic development bond volume cap" means the dollar amount of recovery zone economic development bonds to be allocated by the federal government to the state and by the state to the state's counties and large municipalities pursuant to section 1400U-1 of the internal revenue code.

"Recovery zone facility bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 1400U-3 of the internal revenue code.

"Recovery zone facility bond volume cap" means the dollar amount of recovery zone facility bonds to be allocated by the federal government to the state and by the state to the state's counties and large municipalities pursuant to section 1400U-1 of the internal revenue code.

"School district qualified school construction bond volume cap" means the volume cap for qualified school construction bonds allocated by the federal government to school districts of the state pursuant to section 54F of the internal revenue code.

(37.5) "Specified tax credit bond" has the same meaning as set forth in section 6431 of the internal revenue code.

"State qualified school construction bond volume cap" means the volume cap for qualified school construction bonds allocated by the federal government to the state pursuant to section 54F of the internal revenue code.

"Stimulus obligation" means any bond or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement that qualifies as a build America bond, clean renewable energy bond, new clean renewable energy bond, qualified energy conservation bond, qualified school construction bond, qualified zone academy bond, or recovery zone bond.

"Stimulus obligation document" means any resolution, ordinance, trust indenture, loan agreement, financing agreement, financed purchase of an asset agreement, certificate of participation agreement, lease, agreement, contract, or other instrument under which a stimulus obligation is issued or entered into or pursuant to which a public entity incurs obligations with respect to a stimulus obligation and any ancillary agreement entered into pursuant to section 11-59.7-104 (2).

"Type of" means, when used with respect to any stimulus obligation, any one of a build America bond, clean renewable energy bond, new clean renewable energy bond, qualified energy conservation bond, qualified school construction bond, qualified zone academy bond, or recovery zone bond.

"Volume cap" means the dollar amount of any stimulus obligation allocated to the state or another public entity pursuant to the federal recovery and reinvestment act or any other federal law.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2191, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2010:

(10) and (11) amended and (37.5) added, (SB 10-200), ch. 234, p. 1027, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2012:

(8.5) added and (13) repealed, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 956, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP, (1)(b), (4), (7), (19), IP(20), (20)(o), (39), and (40) amended, (5.5) and (11.5) added, and (17) repealed, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1988, § 1, effective July 1.

11-59.7-104. Stimulus obligations authorized under state law - ancillary agreements.

Public entities may issue or enter into stimulus obligations as authorized by this article 59.7. Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 11-59.7-105, each type of stimulus obligation shall be issued or entered into by a public entity in accordance with a law of the state that authorizes or permits the public entity to issue bonds or enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement to finance or refinance a project that may be financed or refinanced with proceeds of the type of stimulus obligation under federal law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of any other law of the state:

Any public entity that is authorized or permitted under the laws of the state to issue bonds to finance or refinance a project that under federal law may be financed or refinanced with proceeds of build America bonds may issue the bonds as build America bonds. Any public entity that is authorized or permitted under the laws of the state to enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement to finance or refinance a project that may be financed or refinanced under federal law with proceeds of build America bonds may enter into the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement as a build America bond.

Any public entity that is authorized or permitted under the laws of the state to issue bonds to finance or refinance a project that under federal law may be financed or refinanced with proceeds of a type of stimulus obligation other than a build America bond may issue the type of stimulus obligation:

To finance or refinance any project that may be financed or refinanced under federal law with proceeds of the type of stimulus obligation; and

To issue bonds as the type of stimulus obligation under federal law.

Any public entity that is authorized or permitted under the laws of the state to enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement to finance or refinance a project that may be financed or refinanced under federal law with proceeds of a type of stimulus obligation other than a build America bond may:

Enter into a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement to finance or refinance any project that may be financed or refinanced under federal law with proceeds of the type of stimulus obligation; and

Enter into the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement as a stimulus obligation under federal law.

To the extent elected by a public entity pursuant to section 11-57-204 (1), part 2 of article 57 of this title shall apply to stimulus obligations issued or entered into by public entities, stimulus obligations shall be securities, and public entities, as defined in section 11-59.7-103 (20), shall also be public entities for purposes of part 2 of article 57 of this title.

A stimulus obligation may be sold at any price, be subject to optional or mandatory redemption or optional or mandatory tender at any time and at any price, and contain any other special provisions that the governing body of the public entity determines are necessary or convenient to issue or enter into the stimulus obligation at a cost and on terms, and with payments scheduled in a manner, that is determined by the governing body to be advantageous to the public entity.

The right to receive any payment of principal of, any interest on, or any other amount with respect to a stimulus obligation, the right to claim any tax credit with respect to a stimulus obligation, and the right to receive any federal direct payment in connection with a stimulus obligation may be stripped or separated from one another, may be issued or delivered to different persons, and may be owned and transferred independently of one another.

Any outstanding stimulus obligation may be refunded by or on behalf of the public entity that issued or entered into it pursuant to article 56 of this title or any other law of the state that authorizes the public entity to issue or enter into refunding obligations.

Section 22-41-110, C.R.S., relating to timely payment of school district obligations, shall apply to a stimulus obligation issued or entered into by a school district that is a general obligation bond issued by a school district pursuant to article 42 or 43 of title 22, C.R.S., an obligation of a school district in connection with a lease agreement or installment purchase agreement entered into by a school district under section 22-32-127 or 22-45-103 (1)(c), C.R.S., or a refunding bond issued by a school district pursuant to article 56 of this title.

Section 23-5-139, C.R.S., relating to the higher education revenue bond intercept program, shall apply to any stimulus obligation:

That is issued or entered into:

By a public institution of higher education;

By a recovery and reinvestment act finance authority created by a contract to which a public institution of higher education is a party; or

By any other public entity to finance or refinance a project that is or is to be owned by or used by a public institution of higher education; and

That meets the other conditions specified in section 23-5-139, C.R.S.

Any stimulus obligation issued or entered into for the purpose of financing or refinancing charter school capital construction by a public entity other than a school district on behalf of a charter school that is entitled to receive funding from the public school fund pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, C.R.S., shall qualify for direct payments under section 22-30.5-406, C.R.S. The charter school debt service reserve fund, as defined in section 22-30.5-408 (1)(a), C.R.S., for any stimulus obligation that is issued by the Colorado educational and cultural facilities authority created in section 23-15-104 (1)(a), C.R.S., that is a qualified charter school bond, as defined in section 22-30.5-408 (1)(d), C.R.S., issued on behalf of a qualified charter school, as defined in section 22-30.5-408 (1)(c), C.R.S., and that meets the other conditions set forth in section 22-30.5-408, C.R.S., shall qualify for replenishment under section 22-30.5-408, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Proceeds of stimulus obligations, moneys held in any sinking fund relating to any stimulus obligation, and other moneys relating to any stimulus obligation may be invested by the state treasurer in any investment or securities permitted by article 36 of title 24, C.R.S., and by the state treasurer or any other public entity in any investment or securities permitted by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., subject to the following modifications:

Any limitations on the maturity of the investment or securities or any securities subject to a repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, or other investment shall not apply so long as the investment or securities mature on or before the last maturity of the stimulus obligation;

Any limitations on variable rate investments and securities shall not apply; and

Public entities may agree to invest moneys in the investment or securities in advance of the receipt of the moneys.

Public entities also may direct a corporate trustee that holds proceeds of stimulus obligations, moneys held in any sinking fund relating to any stimulus obligation, and other moneys relating to any stimulus obligation to invest or deposit the proceeds or moneys in investments or deposits other than those specified by article 36 of title 24, C.R.S., and part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., if the governing body of the public entity determines that the investment or deposit meets the standard established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., the income is at least comparable to income available on investments or deposits specified by said article 36 or part 6, and the investment will assist the public entity in the financing or refinancing of projects that may be financed or refinanced with the proceeds of its stimulus obligations. Any earnings from any investment or securities permitted by this paragraph (k) may be used and may be pledged to make payments to the owners of stimulus obligations or other persons or may be used for any other lawful purpose for which the public entity may spend money.

The interest on and income from any stimulus obligation shall be exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state. In the stimulus obligation documents, the public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation may make elections under the internal revenue code, including but not limited to an election to designate the stimulus obligation as a qualified tax-exempt obligation for purposes of section 265 of the internal revenue code, an election to treat the stimulus obligation as a specified tax credit bond, or an election to receive federal direct payments with respect to the stimulus obligation, and may waive the exemption of the interest on and income from any stimulus obligation from taxation and assessments in the state.

All banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any moneys within their control in stimulus obligations.

Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in stimulus obligations if the stimulus obligations satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. This paragraph (n) shall not limit the power of a public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation to enter into an ancillary agreement with another public entity under which the other public entity agrees to make payments to the public entity that issues or enters into the stimulus obligation on any terms agreed to by the two public entities.

A public entity may take any action in connection with any stimulus obligation, and the investment and use of the proceeds, any federal direct payments, or any other moneys received in connection with any stimulus obligation, that the governing body of the public entity determines is necessary or convenient and is not inconsistent with this article.

Any public entity that is authorized to issue or enter into a stimulus obligation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is also authorized to enter into ancillary agreements with respect to the stimulus obligation and to use and to pledge any amounts received or to be received by the public entity under any such ancillary agreement for the payment of or compliance with the terms of stimulus obligation documents relating to the stimulus obligation.

A public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation may take any action required to comply with, and may covenant in any stimulus obligation document that it will comply with, any provision of federal law applicable to the stimulus obligation, including but not limited to the applicable provisions of the federal recovery and reinvestment act relating to labor standards and reports to the federal government.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2196, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2010:

(1)(g) and (1)(l) amended, (SB 10-200), ch. 234, p. 1028, § 2, effective May 18; (1)(j) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2066, § 15, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1990, § 2, effective July 1.

11-59.7-105. Federal tax credits - federal direct payments.

Any federal tax credit that may be claimed by an owner of a stimulus obligation or any other person in connection with a stimulus obligation shall not be treated as revenue of any public entity and shall not be considered in determining any amount payable by any public entity on or with respect to any stimulus obligation.

A public entity that issues or enters into a stimulus obligation may elect in accordance with federal law to receive a federal direct payment and may use any federal direct payment to make payments to the owners of the stimulus obligation or other persons or for any other lawful purpose for which the public entity may spend money and may deposit any federal direct payment in any fund or account pending such use.

For purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, federal direct payments are federal funds, federal direct payments are not included in fiscal year spending of any public entity, and the receipt of federal direct payments is not a grant from any Colorado state or local government.

A public entity may pledge any federal direct payments expected to be received in connection with bonds that qualify as stimulus obligations to make payments to the owners of the bonds or other persons. Any portion of the debt service on any stimulus obligation may be payable in amounts corresponding to expected federal direct payments, may be payable solely from expected federal direct payments, or may have a priority claim on expected federal direct payments. If, and to the extent that, a public entity pledges federal direct payments expected to be received in connection with bonds to make payments to the owners of the bonds or other persons, the federal direct payments that the public entity expects to receive with respect to the bonds shall be netted against and shall reduce the amount of interest on the bonds and all other amounts payable by the public entity on or with respect to the bonds for purposes of any notice delivered pursuant to section 20 (3)(b) of article X of the state constitution and for purposes of applying any limitation or restriction under the state constitution, any law of the state, any ballot question or ballot issue, any ancillary agreement, or any ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the public entity relating to the bonds, including but not limited to any limitation on:

Interest or any other amount payable on or with respect to the bonds;

The net effective interest rate and net interest cost on the bonds;

The repayment cost of the bonds; and

The amount of debt the public entity may incur.

A public entity may identify federal direct payments expected to be received in connection with a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement that qualifies as a stimulus obligation as the intended source for payment of any portion of the payments under the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement. Any portion of the payments payable under any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement that qualifies as a stimulus obligation may be payable in amounts corresponding to expected federal direct payments, and federal direct payments may be identified as the intended sole source or intended priority source for payment of any portion of the payments payable under any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement that qualifies as a stimulus obligation. If, and to the extent that, a public entity identifies federal direct payments expected to be received in connection with a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement as an intended source of payment, the federal direct payments that the public entity expects to receive with respect to the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement shall be netted against and shall reduce the amount of payments under the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement representing interest, and all other amounts payable by the public entity under or with respect to the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, for purposes of applying any limitation or restriction under the state constitution, any state law, any ballot question or ballot issue, any ancillary agreement, or any ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the public entity relating to the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, including but not limited to any limitation on interest or any other amount payable under the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement and any determination as to the reasonableness of the payments under the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement.

The governing body of a public institution of higher education may designate and treat any federal direct payment as revenues of an auxiliary facility or an institutional enterprise for purposes of sections 23-5-101.5 to 23-5-105.5, C.R.S., and section 23-5-139, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2200, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1990, § 3, effective July 1.

11-59.7-106. Qualified school construction bond volume cap - rules.

The state qualified school construction bond volume cap shall be allocated to the public school capital construction assistance board, which, subject to the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, shall use the volume cap to enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements to assist the financing or refinancing of projects pursuant to article 43.7 of title 22.

Any portion of the school district qualified school construction bond volume cap for a calendar year that is allocated to a school district that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the school district or for which a contract to purchase bonds or instruments evidencing interests in a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement has not been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year shall, on November 11 of the calendar year, automatically by law and without any action by the school district be reallocated by the school district to the public school capital construction assistance board. If a contract to purchase has been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year but the related bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement is not issued or entered into on or before November 30 of the calendar year, the volume cap shall automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board on December 1 of the calendar year.

If the public school capital construction assistance board determines that it cannot use, or that a school district or a charter school bond issuer can make better use of, any portion of the state qualified school construction bond volume cap for a calendar year or any portion of the school district qualified school construction bond volume cap for a calendar year that is reallocated to the board pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the board may allocate the portion of the volume cap to the school district or charter school bond issuer for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project approved by the board. Any volume cap allocated to a school district or charter school bond issuer pursuant to this subsection (3) that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into or for which a contract to purchase bonds or instruments evidencing interests in a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement has not been entered into on or before November 10 of any calendar year shall, on November 11 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board. If a contract to purchase has been entered into on or before November 10 of the calendar year but the related bonds or financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement is not issued or entered into on or before November 30 of the calendar year, the volume cap shall automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board on December 1 of the calendar year. The public school capital construction assistance board may use or reallocate to any school district or charter school bond issuer, for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project approved by the board, any volume cap that reverts to the board pursuant to this subsection (3) or may carry the volume cap forward pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Any volume cap that is reallocated to a school district or charter school bond issuer pursuant to this subsection (3) that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by noon, prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of a calendar year shall, at 12:01 p.m., prevailing Denver time, on December 31 of the calendar year, automatically revert to the public school capital construction assistance board.

The public school capital construction assistance board shall carry forward to the next calendar year any portion of the qualified school construction bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the end of a calendar year. In selecting projects to assist the financing or refinancing of pursuant to article 43.7 of title 22, and in selecting projects of school districts for the purpose of allocating the qualified school construction bond volume cap pursuant to this section, the public school capital construction assistance board shall prioritize projects that are ready to be financed or refinanced and that are most consistent with the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b). The public school capital construction assistance board shall use or allocate the qualified school construction bond volume cap in a manner consistent with federal law and the purpose of this article 59.7 described in section 11-59.7-102 (1)(b) to minimize the qualified school construction bond volume cap that has not been used on bonds issued or one or more financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into on or before the expiration of the qualified school construction bond program. A school district to which the school district qualified school construction bond volume cap has been allocated under federal law or a school district or charter school bond issuer to which the qualified school construction bond volume cap has been allocated pursuant to this section may, at any time, relinquish the volume cap to the public school capital construction assistance board. Any volume cap relinquished may be used by the public school capital construction assistance board to enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements to assist the financing or refinancing of projects pursuant to article 43.7 of title 22 may be reallocated by the board to a school district or charter school bond issuer for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project approved by the board, or may be carried forward to the next calendar year. The public school capital construction assistance board may promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 regarding the manner in which the qualified school construction bond volume cap will be allocated.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (HB 09-1346), ch. 402, p. 2202, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 1991, § 4, effective July 1.